Washington statutes.
RCW 35.68.075

Curb ramps for persons with disabilities—Required—Standards and requirements.

(1) The standard for construction on any county road, or city or town street, for which curbs in combination with sidewalks, paths, or other pedestrian access ways are to be constructed, shall be not less than two ramps per lineal block on or near the crosswalks at intersections. Such ramps shall be at least thirty-six inches wide and so constructed as to allow reasonable access to the crosswalk for persons with physical disabilities, without uniquely endangering blind persons.

(2) Standards set for curb ramping under subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to any curb existing upon enactment of this section but shall apply to all new curb construction and to all replacement curbs constructed at any point in a block which gives reasonable access to a crosswalk.

(3) Upon September 21, 1977, every ramp thereafter constructed under subsection (1) of this section, which serves one end of a crosswalk, shall be matched by another ramp at the other end of the crosswalk. However, no ramp shall be required at the other end of the crosswalk if there is no curb nor sidewalk at the other end of the crosswalk. Nor shall any matching ramp constructed pursuant to this subsection require a subsequent matching ramp.

[ 2020 c 274 s 12; 1989 c 173 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 137 s 1; 1973 c 83 s 1.]